Utah statutes.
19-6-708.   Registration and permit exemptions.
(1)  The following persons are subject to Section 19-6-706, but are not
subject to regulation as a registered or permitted site or facility under this
part:
(a)  generators of DIYer used oil; and
(b)  farmers who generate in a calendar year an average of 25 gallons per
month or less of used oil from vehicles or machinery used on the farm.
(2)  The following are subject to rules made by the board as necessary to
obtain and maintain primacy of the state used oil program under 40 C.F.R.
279, Standards for the Management of Used Oil, but are not subject to any
other provision of this part:
(a)  mixtures of used oil and diesel fuel mixed on-site by the generator of
the used oil for use in the generator's own vehicles are not subject to this
part once the used oil and diesel fuel have been mixed, but prior to mixing,
the used oil is subject to this part;
(b)  used oil transporters and used oil burners conducting incidental
processing operations that occur during the normal course of used oil
management prior to transportation or burning;
(c)  on-specification or off-specification used oil, after it is delivered, as
documented by manifest, to a burner authorized to operate by the board or this
part and rules made under this part;
(d)  used oil burners authorized by the board to burn on-specification or off-
specification used oil;
(e)  used oil placed directly into a crude oil or natural gas pipeline, after
the used oil is introduced into the pipeline;
(f)  used oil generated on vessels due to normal shipboard operations is not
subject to this part until it is transported ashore;
(g)  rerefining distillation bottoms used as feedstock to manufacture asphalt
products;
(h)  materials reclaimed from used oil, used beneficially, and not burned for
energy recovery or used in a manner constituting disposal;
(i)  materials derived from used oil that are disposed of or used in a manner
constituting disposal, but are subject to regulation under this chapter if the
materials are identified as hazardous waste;
(j)  wastewater containing a de minimis amount of used oil, as defined in
Subsection (3);
(k)  used oil contaminated with polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs), if it is
subject to regulation under 40 CFR 761, Toxic Substances Control Act;
(l)  used oils that are a hazardous waste under this chapter and may not be
recycled; and
(m)  used oils that are not hazardous waste under this chapter and cannot be
recycled under this part.
(3) (a)  As used in Subsection (2)(j), "de minimis quantities of used oil"
means:
(i)  small spills, leaks, or drippings from pumps, machinery, pipes, and other
similar equipment during normal operations; or
(ii)  small amounts of oil lost to the wastewater treatment system or unit
during washing or draining operations.
(b)  "De minimis quantities of used oil" does not include used oil discarded
as a result of abnormal operations resulting in substantial leaks, spills, or
other releases, or to used oil recovered from wastewaters.
